dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX pN Y 60
SFX pN valoir valoir/n'q'd'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir valant/n'q'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir valu/q' valoir
SFX pN valoir valus revaloir
SFX pN valoir value revaloir
SFX pN valoir values revaloir
SFX pN valoir vaux/n'j'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaux/n'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaut/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir valons/n't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valez/n'm' valoir
SFX pN valoir valent/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir valais/n'j'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valais/n'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valait/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir valions/n't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valiez/n'm' valoir
SFX pN valoir valaient/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir valus/n'j'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valus/n'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valut/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir valumes/n't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valutes/n'm' valoir
SFX pN valoir valurent/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrai/n'j'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudras/n'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudra/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrons/n't' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrez/n'm' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudront/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrais/n'j'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrais/n'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrait/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrions/n't' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudriez/n'm' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudraient/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaille/n'j'm't' quivaloir
SFX pN valoir vale revaloir
SFX pN valoir vailles/n'm't' quivaloir
SFX pN valoir vales revaloir
SFX pN valoir vaille/n'm't's' quivaloir
SFX pN valoir vale revaloir
SFX pN valoir vailions/n't' quivaloir
SFX pN valoir valions revaloir
SFX pN valoir vailiez/n'm' quivaloir
SFX pN valoir valiez revaloir
SFX pN valoir vaillent/n'm't's' quivaloir
SFX pN valoir valent revaloir
SFX pN valoir valusse/n'j'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valusses/n'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valut/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir valussions/n't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valussiez/n'm' valoir
SFX pN valoir valussent/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaux quivaloir
SFX pN valoir vaux valoir
SFX pN valoir valons quivaloir
SFX pN valoir valons valoir
SFX pN valoir valez quivaloir
SFX pN valoir valez valoir

SFX pO N 15
SFX pO valoir valoir revaloir
SFX pO valoir valant revaloir
SFX pO valoir valu revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrai revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudras revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudra revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrons revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrez revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudront revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrais revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrais revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrait revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrions revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudriez revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudraient revaloir

SFX pP N 2
SFX pP paroir paroir comparoir
SFX pP paroir parant comparoir

SFX pQ N 2
SFX pQ haloir haloir chaloir
SFX pQ haloir haut chaloir

SFX pR Y 2
SFX pR pparoir pparoir/n'q'd' apparoir
SFX pR pparoir ppert/n'q' apparoir

SFX pS Y 84
SFX pS oir oir/n'q'd'l'm't's' oir
SFX pS sseoir sseyant/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyant/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssis/q' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssise/q' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssises/q' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssieds/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssieds/n'q'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssied/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyons/n'q'l't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyez/n'q'l'm' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyent/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssois/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssois/n'q'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoit/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyons/n'q'l't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyez/n'q'l'm' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyais/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyais/n'q'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyait/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyions/n'q'l't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyiez/n'q'l'm' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyaient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyais/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyais/n'q'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyait/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyions/n'q'l't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyiez/n'q'l'm' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyaient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssis/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssis/n'q'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssit/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssimes/n'q'l't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssites/n'q'l'm' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssirent/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssierai/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssieras/n'q'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssiera/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssierons/n'q'l't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssierez/n'q'l'm' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssieront/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoirai/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoiras/n'q'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoira/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoirons/n'q'l't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoirez/n'q'l'm' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoiront/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssierais/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssierais/n'q'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssierait/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssierions/n'q'l't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssieriez/n'q'l'm' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssieraient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoirais/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoirais/n'q'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoirait/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoirions/n'q'l't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoiriez/n'q'l'm' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoiraient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseye/n'j'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyes/n'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseye/n'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyions/n'l't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyiez/n'l'm' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyent/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoie/n'j'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoies/n'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoie/n'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyions/n'l't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyiez/n'l'm' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssisse/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssisses/n'q'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssit/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssissions/n'q'l't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssissiez/n'q'l'm' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssissent/n'q'l'm't's' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssieds/n'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyons/n'l' seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyez/n'l'm' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssois/n'l'm't' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyons/n'l' seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyez/n'l'm' seoir

SFX pT N 50
SFX pT oir oir oir
SFX pT urseoir ursoyant seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursis seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursise seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursises seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursois seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursois seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoit seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoyons seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoyez seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoient seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoyais seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoyais seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoyait seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoyions seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoyiez seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoyaient seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursis seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursis seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursit seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursimes seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursites seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursirent seoir
SFX pT urseoir urseoirai seoir
SFX pT urseoir urseoiras seoir
SFX pT urseoir urseoira seoir
SFX pT urseoir urseoirons seoir
SFX pT urseoir urseoirez seoir
SFX pT urseoir urseoiront seoir
SFX pT urseoir urseoirais seoir
SFX pT urseoir urseoirais seoir
SFX pT urseoir urseoirait seoir
SFX pT urseoir urseoirions seoir
SFX pT urseoir urseoiriez seoir
SFX pT urseoir urseoiraient seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoie seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoies seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoie seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoyions seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoyiez seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoient seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursisse seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursisses seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursit seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursissions seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursissiez seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursissent seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursois seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoyons seoir
SFX pT urseoir ursoyez seoir

SFX pU N 5
SFX pU eoir eoir seoir
SFX pU eoir eant seoir
SFX pU eoir is seoir
SFX pU eoir ise seoir
SFX pU eoir ises seoir
