dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.dic
apparoir/pR()
asseoir/pS()
chaloir/pQ()
comparoir/pP()
equivaloir/pN()
prevaloir/pN()
rasseoir/pS()
revaloir/pO()
seoir/pU()
surseoir/pT()
